src/srseng/resources/fst/srs2eng.lexc
< [ s o m e o n e %  i s %  a b o u t %  t o %  b e c o m e %  %( s o m e t h i n g %) ] : [ á d ī d á n á ɫ "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ I %  w i l l %  b e c o m e %  a %  p o l i c e m a n %/ s o l d i e r ] : [ t ō s g ū n ā %  g w á n á "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  w i l l %  b e c o m e %  a %  p o l i c e m a n %/ s o l d i e r ] : [ t ō s g ū n ā %  g w á n á "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  w i l l %  b e c o m e %  a %  p o l i c e m a n %/ s o l d i e r ] : [ t ō s g ū n ā %  g w á n á "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  w i l l %  b e c o m e %  a %  p o l i c e m a n %/ s o l d i e r ] : [ t ō s g ū n ā %  g w á n á "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  w i l l %  b e c o m e %  a %  p o l i c e m a n %/ s o l d i e r ] : [ t ō s g ū n ā %  g w á n á "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  w i l l %  b e c o m e %  a %  p o l i c e m a n %/ s o l d i e r ] : [ t ō s g ū n ā %  g w á n á "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  w i l l %  b e c o m e %  a %  p o l i c e m a n %/ s o l d i e r ] : [ t ō s g ū n ā %  g w á n á "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" ] > # ;
< [ I %  a m %  a b o u t %  t o %  b e c o m e %  a %  d o c t o r ] : [ t ɬ ' ū w d ī n à %  g w á d ī d á n á ɫ "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a r e %  a b o u t %  t o %  b e c o m e %  a %  d o c t o r ] : [ t ɬ ' ū w d ī n à %  g w á d ī d á n á ɫ "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  i s %  a b o u t %  t o %  b e c o m e %  a %  d o c t o r ] : [ t ɬ ' ū w d ī n à %  g w á d ī d á n á ɫ "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  a r e %  a b o u t %  t o %  b e c o m e %  a %  d o c t o r ] : [ t ɬ ' ū w d ī n à %  g w á d ī d á n á ɫ "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  a r e %  a b o u t %  t o %  b e c o m e %  a %  d o c t o r ] : [ t ɬ ' ū w d ī n à %  g w á d ī d á n á ɫ "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  a r e %  a b o u t %  t o %  b e c o m e %  a %  d o c t o r ] : [ t ɬ ' ū w d ī n à %  g w á d ī d á n á ɫ "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  i s %  a b o u t %  t o %  b e c o m e %  a %  d o c t o r ] : [ t ɬ ' ū w d ī n à %  g w á d ī d á n á ɫ "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" ] > # ;
< [ I %  b e c a m e %  c h i e f ] : [ x ā k ī j ī %  g w á j à g "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg1" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  b e c a m e %  c h i e f ] : [ x ā k ī j ī %  g w á j à g "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg2" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  b e c a m e %  c h i e f ] : [ x ā k ī j ī %  g w á j à g "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  b e c a m e %  c h i e f ] : [ x ā k ī j ī %  g w á j à g "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl1" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  b e c a m e %  c h i e f ] : [ x ā k ī j ī %  g w á j à g "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl2" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  b e c a m e %  c h i e f ] : [ x ā k ī j ī %  g w á j à g "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  b e c a m e %  c h i e f ] : [ x ā k ī j ī %  g w á j à g "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg4" ] > # ;
< [ t h a t %  i s %  h o w %  I %  w i l l %  b e %/ t h a t %  i s %  w h a t %  I %  w i l l %  d o ] : [ x ā n á "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" ] > # ;
< [ t h a t %  i s %  h o w %  y o u %  w i l l %  b e %/ t h a t %  i s %  w h a t %  y o u %  w i l l %  d o ] : [ x ā n á "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg2" ] > # ;
< [ t h a t %  i s %  h o w %  h e %/ s h e %  w i l l %  b e %/ t h a t %  i s %  w h a t %  h e %/ s h e %  w i l l %  d o ] : [ x ā n á "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ t h a t %  i s %  h o w %  w e %  w i l l %  b e %/ t h a t %  i s %  w h a t %  w e %  w i l l %  d o ] : [ x ā n á "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" ] > # ;
< [ t h a t %  i s %  h o w %  y o u %  a l l %  w i l l %  b e %/ t h a t %  i s %  w h a t %  y o u %  a l l %  w i l l %  d o ] : [ x ā n á "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjPl2" ] > # ;
< [ t h a t %  i s %  h o w %  t h e y %  w i l l %  b e %/ t h a t %  i s %  w h a t %  t h e y %  w i l l %  d o ] : [ x ā n á "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" ] > # ;
< [ t h a t %  i s %  h o w %  s o m e o n e %  w i l l %  b e %/ t h a t %  i s %  w h a t %  s o m e o n e %  w i l l %  d o ] : [ x ā n á "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjX" ] > # ;
< [ t h a t %  i s %  h o w %  I %  b e c a m e %/ t h a t %  i s %  w h a t %  I %  d i d ] : [ "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg1" ] > # ;
< [ t h a t %  i s %  h o w %  y o u %  b e c a m e %/ t h a t %  i s %  w h a t %  I %  d i d ] : [ "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg1" ] > # ;
< [ t h a t %  i s %  h o w %  h e %/ s h e %  b e c a m e %/ t h a t %  i s %  w h a t %  I %  d i d ] : [ "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg1" ] > # ;
< [ t h a t %  i s %  h o w %  w e %  b e c a m e %/ t h a t %  i s %  w h a t %  I %  d i d ] : [ "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg1" ] > # ;
< [ t h a t %  i s %  h o w %  y o u %  a l l %  b e c a m e %/ t h a t %  i s %  w h a t %  I %  d i d ] : [ "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg1" ] > # ;
< [ t h a t %  i s %  h o w %  t h e y %  b e c a m e %/ t h a t %  i s %  w h a t %  I %  d i d ] : [ "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg1" ] > # ;
< [ t h a t %  i s %  h o w %  s o m e o n e %  b e c a m e %/ t h a t %  i s %  w h a t %  I %  d i d ] : [ "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg1" ] > # ;
< [ I %  b e c o m e %  l i k e %  t h a t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] : [ "+V" "+I" "+SbjSg1" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  b e c o m e %  l i k e %  t h a t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] : [ "+V" "+I" "+SbjSg2" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  b e c o m e s %  l i k e %  t h a t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] : [ "+V" "+I" "+SbjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  b e c o m e %  l i k e %  t h a t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] : [ "+V" "+I" "+SbjPl1" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  b e c o m e %  l i k e %  t h a t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] : [ "+V" "+I" "+SbjPl2" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  b e c o m e %  l i k e %  t h a t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] : [ "+V" "+I" "+SbjPl3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  b e c o m e s %  l i k e %  t h a t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] : [ "+V" "+I" "+SbjSg4" ] > # ;
< [ t h a t %  i s %  h o w %  I %  b e c o m e %/ d o %  i t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] : [ "+V" "+T" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ t h a t %  i s %  h o w %  y o u %  b e c o m e %/ d o %  i t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] : [ "+V" "+T" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ t h a t %  i s %  h o w %  h e %/ s h e %  b e c o m e s %/ d o e s %  i t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] : [ "+V" "+T" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ t h a t %  i s %  h o w %  w e %  b e c o m e %/ d o %  i t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] : [ "+V" "+T" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ t h a t %  i s %  h o w %  y o u %  a l l %  b e c o m e %/ d o %  i t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] : [ "+V" "+T" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ t h a t %  i s %  h o w %  t h e y %  b e c o m e %/ d o %  i t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] : [ "+V" "+T" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ t h a t %  i s %  h o w %  s o m e o n e %  b e c o m e s %/ d o e s %  i t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] : [ "+V" "+T" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ I %  w i l l %  d o %/ m a k e %  i t ] : [ á y ì l á "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  w i l l %  d o %/ m a k e %  i t ] : [ á y ì l á "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  w i l l %  d o %/ m a k e %  i t ] : [ á y ì l á "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  w i l l %  d o %/ m a k e %  i t ] : [ á y ì l á "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  w i l l %  d o %/ m a k e %  i t ] : [ á y ì l á "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  w i l l %  d o %/ m a k e %  i t ] : [ á y ì l á "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  d o %/ w i l l %  m a k e %  i t ] : [ á y ì l á "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  e a c h %  a n d %  e v e r y %  o n e %  w i l l %  d o %/ m a k e %  i t ] : [ á y ì l á "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" "+Distr" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  e a c h %  a n d %  e v e r y %  o n e %  w i l l %  d o %/ m a k e %  i t ] : [ á y ì l á "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" "+Distr" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  e a c h %  a n d %  e v e r y %  o n e %  w i l l %  d o %/ m a k e %  i t ] : [ á y ì l á "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" "+Distr" ] > # ;
< [ p e o p l e %  e a c h %  a n d %  e v e r y %  o n e %  w i l l %  d o %/ m a k e %  i t ] : [ á y ì l á "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" "+Distr" ] > # ;
< [ I %  a m %  w o r k i n g %  o n %  m a k i n g %  a %  h o o p ] : [ m à s %  á y i l á ɫ "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a r e %  w o r k i n g %  o n %  m a k i n g %  a %  h o o p ] : [ m à s %  á y i l á ɫ "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  i s %  w o r k i n g %  o n %  m a k i n g %  a %  h o o p ] : [ m à s %  á y i l á ɫ "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  a r e %  w o r k i n g %  o n %  m a k i n g %  a %  h o o p %  %( P R O G R E S S I V E %) ] : [ m à s %  á y i l á ɫ "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  a r e %  w o r k i n g %  o n %  m a k i n g %  a %  h o o p ] : [ m à s %  á y i l á ɫ "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  a r e %  w o r k i n g %  o n %  m a k i n g %  a %  h o o p ] : [ m à s %  á y i l á ɫ "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  i s %  w o r k i n g %  o n %  m a k i n g %  a %  h o o p ] : [ m à s %  á y i l á ɫ "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ I %  a m %  a b o u t %  t o %  s t a r t %  m a k i n g %  i t ] : [ á y i d ī d á l á ɫ "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a r e %  a b o u t %  t o %  s t a r t %  m a k i n g %  i t ] : [ á y i d ī d á l á ɫ "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  i s %  a b o u t %  t o %  s t a r t %  m a k i n g %  i t ] : [ á y i d ī d á l á ɫ "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  a r e %  a b o u t %  t o %  s t a r t %  m a k i n g %  i t ] : [ á y i d ī d á l á ɫ "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  a r e %  a b o u t %  t o %  s t a r t %  m a k i n g %  i t ] : [ á y i d ī d á l á ɫ "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  a r e %  a b o u t %  t o %  s t a r t %  m a k i n g %  i t ] : [ á y i d ī d á l á ɫ "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  i s %  a b o u t %  t o %  s t a r t %  m a k i n g %  i t ] : [ á y i d ī d á l á ɫ "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ I %  a m %  m a k i n g %  i t %  l i k e %  a %  h o u s e ] : [ n ā s ʔ à g h á %- g ū %  á y á l á ɫ "+V" "+T" "+Prog" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a r e %  m a k i n g %  i t %  l i k e %  a %  h o u s e ] : [ n ā s ʔ à g h á %- g ū %  á y á l á ɫ "+V" "+T" "+Prog" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  i s %  m a k i n g %  i t %  l i k e %  a %  h o u s e ] : [ n ā s ʔ à g h á %- g ū %  á y á l á ɫ "+V" "+T" "+Prog" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  a r e %  m a k i n g %  i t %  l i k e %  a %  h o u s e ] : [ n ā s ʔ à g h á %- g ū %  á y á l á ɫ "+V" "+T" "+Prog" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  a r e %  m a k i n g %  i t %  l i k e %  a %  h o u s e ] : [ n ā s ʔ à g h á %- g ū %  á y á l á ɫ "+V" "+T" "+Prog" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  a r e %  m a k i n g %  i t %  l i k e %  a %  h o u s e ] : [ n ā s ʔ à g h á %- g ū %  á y á l á ɫ "+V" "+T" "+Prog" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  i s %  m a k i n g %  i t %  l i k e %  a %  h o u s e ] : [ n ā s ʔ à g h á %- g ū %  á y á l á ɫ "+V" "+T" "+Prog" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ I %  m a d e %/ d i d %  i t ] : [ á y ì l à g "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
